Georgia statutes. TITLE 37 Mental Health
CHAPTER 11 Psychiatric Advance Directive

Effective date.

This chapter became effective July 1, 2022.

Cross references.

Advanced directive for health care, § 31-32-1 et seq.

37-11-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Psychiatric Advance Directive Act.”

History. Code 1981, §

37-11-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 611, § 1-1/HB 752.

37-11-2.
Purpose.

This chapter is enacted in recognition of the fundamental right of an individual to have power over decisions relating to his or her mental health care as a matter of public policy.

History. Code 1981, §

37-11-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 611, § 1-1/HB 752.

37-11-3.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Capable” means not incapable of making mental health care decisions.

“Competent adult” means a person of sound mind who is 18 years of age or older or is an emancipated minor.

“Declarant” means a person who has executed a psychiatric advance directive authorized by this chapter.

“Facility” means a hospital, skilled nursing facility, hospice, institution, home, residential or nursing facility, treatment facility, and any other facility or service which has a valid permit or provisional permit issued under Chapter 7 of Title 31
or which is licensed, accredited, or approved under the laws of any state, and includes hospitals operated by the United States government or by any state or subdivision thereof and community service boards.

“Incapable of making mental health care decisions” means that, in the opinion of a physician or licensed psychologist who has personally examined a declarant, or in the opinion of a court, a declarant lacks the capacity to understand the risks and benefits
of, and the alternatives to, a mental health care decision under consideration and is unable to give or communicate rational reasons for mental health care decisions because of impaired thinking, impaired ability to receive and
evaluate information, or other cognitive disability.

“Mental health care” means any care, treatment, service, or procedure to maintain, diagnose, treat, or provide for a declarant’s mental or emotional illness, developmental disability, or addictive disease.

“Mental health care agent” or “agent” means a person appointed by a declarant to act for and on behalf of such declarant to make decisions related to consent, refusal, or withdrawal of any type of mental health care when such declarant is incapable of
making mental health care decisions for himself or herself. Such term shall include any back-up mental health care agent appointed by a declarant.

“Physician” means a person lawfully licensed in this state to practice medicine pursuant to Article 2 of Chapter 34 of Title 43 and, if the declarant is receiving mental health care in another state, a person lawfully licensed in such state.

“Provider” means any person administering mental health care who is licensed, certified, or otherwise authorized or permitted by law to administer mental health care in the ordinary course of business or the practice of a profession, including, but not
limited to, professional counselors, psychologists, clinical social workers, marriage and family therapists, and clinical nurse specialists in psychiatric and mental health; a physician; or any person acting for any such authorized
person.

“Psychiatric advance directive” or “directive” means a written document voluntarily executed by a person in accordance with the requirements of Code Section 37-11-9.

History. Code 1981, §

37-11-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 611, § 1-1/HB 752.

37-11-4.
Execution of psychiatric advance directive; appointment of mental health care agent.

A competent adult may execute a psychiatric advance directive containing mental health care preferences, information, or instructions regarding his or her mental health care that authorizes and consents to a provider or facility acting in accordance with
such directive. A directive may include consent to or refusal of specified mental health care.

A psychiatric advance directive may include, but shall not be limited to:

The names and telephone numbers of individuals to contact in the event a declarant has a mental health crisis;

Situations that have been known to cause a declarant to experience a mental health crisis;

Responses that have been known to de-escalate a declarant’s mental health crisis;

Responses that may assist a declarant to remain in such declarant’s home during a mental health crisis;

The types of assistance that may help stabilize a declarant if it becomes necessary to enter a facility; and

Medications a declarant is taking or has taken in the past and the effects of such medications.

A psychiatric advance directive may include a mental health care agent.

If a declarant chooses not to appoint an agent, the instructions and desires of a declarant as set forth in the directive shall be followed to the fullest extent possible by every provider or facility to whom the directive is communicated, subject to
the right of the provider or facility to refuse to comply with the directive as set forth in Code Section 37-11-12.

A person shall not be required to execute or refrain from executing a directive as a criterion for insurance, as a condition for receiving mental health care or physical health care services, or as a condition of discharge from a facility.

Unless a declarant indicates otherwise, a psychiatric advance directive shall take precedence over any advance directive for health care executed pursuant to Chapter 32 of Title 31; durable power of attorney for health care creating a health care agency
under the former Chapter 36 of Title 31, as such chapter existed on and before June 30, 2007; health care proxy; or living will that a declarant executed prior to executing a psychiatric advance directive to the extent that such
other documents relate to mental health care and are inconsistent with the psychiatric advance directive.

No provision of this chapter shall be construed to bar use by a declarant of an advance directive for health care under Chapter 32 of Title 31.

History. Code 1981, §

37-11-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 611, § 1-1/HB 752.

37-11-5.
Designation of agent; authority; removal by court.

A declarant may designate a competent adult to act as his or her agent to make decisions about his or her mental health care. An alternative agent may also be designated.

An agent shall have no authority to make mental health care decisions when a declarant is capable.

The authority of an agent shall continue in effect so long as the directive appointing such agent is in effect or until such agent has withdrawn.

An agent appointed by a declarant:

Shall be authorized to make any and all mental health care decisions on behalf of such declarant which such declarant could make if such declarant were capable;

Shall exercise granted powers in a manner consistent with the intent and desires of such declarant. If such declarant’s intentions and desires are not expressed or are unclear, the agent shall act in such declarant’s best interests, considering the benefits,
burdens, and risks of such declarant’s circumstances and mental health care options;

Shall not be under any duty to exercise granted powers or to assume control of or responsibility for such declarant’s mental health care; but, when granted powers are exercised, the agent shall be required to use due care to act for the benefit of such
declarant in accordance with the terms of the psychiatric advance directive;

Shall not make a mental health care decision different from or contrary to such declarant’s instruction if such declarant is capable at the time of the request for consent or refusal of mental health care;

May make a mental health care decision different from or contrary to such declarant’s instruction in such declarant’s psychiatric advance directive if:

Such declarant’s provider or facility determines in good faith at the time of consent or refusal of mental health care that the mental health care requested or refused in the directive’s instructions is:

Unavailable;

Medically contraindicated in a manner that would result in substantial harm to such declarant if administered; or

In the opinion of the provider or facility, inconsistent with reasonable medical standards to benefit such declarant or has proven ineffective in treating such declarant’s mental health condition; and

The mental health care requested or refused in the directive’s instructions is unlikely to be delivered by another provider or facility in the community under the circumstances.

In the event the agent exercises authority under one of the circumstances set forth in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, the agent shall exercise the authority in a manner consistent with the intent and desires of such declarant. If such declarant’s
intentions and desires are not expressed or are unclear, the agent shall act in such declarant’s best interests, considering the benefits, burdens, and risks of such declarant’s circumstances and mental health care
options;

Shall not delegate authority to make mental health care decisions; and

Has the following general powers, unless expressly limited in the psychiatric advance directive:

To sign and deliver all instruments, negotiate and enter into all agreements, and do all other acts reasonably necessary to exercise the powers granted to the agent;

To consent to, authorize, refuse, or withdraw consent to any providers and any type of mental health care of such declarant, including any medication program;

To request and consent to admission or discharge from any facility; and

To contract for mental health care and facilities in the name of and on behalf of such declarant, and the agent shall not be personally financially liable for any services or mental health care contracted for on behalf of such declarant.

A court may remove a mental health care agent if it finds that an agent is not acting in accordance with the declarant’s treatment instructions as expressed in his or her directive.

History. Code 1981, §

37-11-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 611, § 1-1/HB 752.

37-11-6.
Rights of agent.

Except to the extent that a right is limited by a directive or by any state or federal law or regulation, an agent shall have the same right as a declarant to receive information regarding the proposed mental health care and to receive, review, and consent
to disclosure of medical records, including records relating to the treatment of a substance use disorder, relating to that mental health care. All of a declarant’s mental health information and medical records shall remain otherwise
protected under state and federal privilege, and this right of access shall not waive any evidentiary privilege.

At the declarant’s expense and subject to reasonable rules of a provider or facility to prevent disruption of the declarant’s mental health care, an agent shall have the same right the declarant has to examine, copy, and consent to disclosure of all the
declarant’s medical records that the agent deems relevant to the exercise of the agent’s powers, whether the records relate to mental health or any other medical condition and whether they are in the possession of or maintained
by any physician, psychiatrist, psychologist, therapist, facility, or other health care provider, despite contrary provisions of any other statute or rule of law.

The authority given an agent by this Code section shall include all rights that a declarant has under the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, P.L. 104-191, and its implementing regulations regarding the use and disclosure
of individually identifiable health information and other medical records.

History. Code 1981, §

37-11-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 611, § 1-1/HB 752.

U.S. Code.

The federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, referred to in subsection (c), is codified at

42 U.S.C. § 13206
et seq.

37-11-7.
Persons ineligible to serve as agents.

The following persons shall not serve as a declarant’s agent:

Such declarant’s provider or an employee of that provider unless such employee is a family member, friend, or associate of such declarant and is not directly involved in such declarant’s mental health care; or

An employee of the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities or of a local public mental health agency or of any organization that contracts with a local public mental health authority unless such employee is a family member, friend,
or associate of such declarant and is not directly involved in such declarant’s mental health care.

History. Code 1981, §

37-11-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 611, § 1-1/HB 752.

37-11-8.
Withdrawal by agent.

An agent may withdraw by giving written notice to a declarant. If such declarant is incapable of making mental health care decisions, such agent may withdraw by giving written notice to the provider or facility that is providing mental health care to
the declarant at the time of the agent’s withdrawal. Any provider or facility that receives an agent’s withdrawal shall document the withdrawal as part of such declarant’s medical record.

History. Code 1981, §

37-11-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 611, § 1-1/HB 752.

37-11-9.
Witness requirement; period of validity; civil liability of witnesses; copies.

A psychiatric advance directive shall be effective only if it is signed by the declarant and witnessed by two competent adults, but such witnesses shall not be required to be together or present when such declarant signs the directive. The witnesses shall
attest that the declarant is known to them, appears to be of sound mind, is not under duress, fraud, or undue influence, and signed his or her directive in the witness’s presence or acknowledges signing his or her directive. For
purposes of this subsection, the term “of sound mind” means having a decided and rational desire to create a psychiatric advance directive.

A validly executed psychiatric advance directive shall become effective upon its proper execution and shall remain in effect until revoked by the declarant.

The following persons shall not serve as witnesses to the signing of a directive:

A provider who is providing mental health care to the declarant at the time such directive is being executed or an employee of such provider unless such employee is a family member, friend, or associate of such declarant and is not directly involved in
the declarant’s mental health care;

An employee of the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities or of a local public mental health agency or of any organization that contracts with a local public mental health authority unless such person is a family member, friend,
or associate of such declarant and is not directly involved in the declarant’s mental health care; or

A person selected to serve as the declarant’s mental health care agent.

A person who witnesses a psychiatric advance directive in good faith and in accordance with this chapter shall not be civilly liable or criminally prosecuted for actions taken by an agent.

A copy of a directive executed in accordance with this Code section shall be valid and have the same meaning and effect as the original document.

History. Code 1981, §

37-11-9

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 611, § 1-1/HB 752.

37-11-10.
Revocation; effect of marriage or appointment of guardian.

A directive may be revoked in whole or in part at any time by the declarant, so long as such declarant is capable, by any of the following methods:

By completing a new directive that has provisions which are inconsistent with the provisions of a previously executed directive; an advance directive for health care executed pursuant to Chapter 32 of Title 31; a durable power of attorney for health care
creating a health care agency under the former Chapter 36 of Title 31, as such chapter existed on and before June 30, 2007; a health care proxy; or a living will; provided, however, that such revocation shall extend only
so far as the inconsistency exists between the documents and any part of a prior document that is not inconsistent with a subsequent document shall remain unrevoked;

By being obliterated, burned, torn, or otherwise destroyed by the declarant or by some person in the declarant’s presence and at the declarant’s direction indicating an intention to revoke;

By a written revocation clearly expressing the intent of the declarant to revoke the directive signed and dated by the declarant or by a person acting at the declarant’s direction. If the declarant is receiving mental health care in a facility, revocation
of a directive will become effective only upon communication to the attending provider by the declarant or by a person acting at the declarant’s direction. The attending provider shall record in the declarant’s medical
record the time and date when the attending provider received notification of the written revocation; or

By an oral or any other clear expression of the intent to revoke the directive in the presence of a witness 18 years of age or older who, within 30 days of the expression of such intent, signs and dates a writing confirming that such expression of intent
was made. If the declarant is receiving mental health care in a facility, revocation of a directive will become effective only upon communication to the attending provider by the declarant or by a person acting at the declarant’s
direction. The attending provider shall record in the declarant’s medical record the time, date, and place of the revocation and the time, date, and place, if different, when the attending provider received notification
of the revocation. Any person, other than the mental health care agent, to whom an oral or other nonwritten revocation of a directive is communicated or delivered shall make all reasonable efforts to inform the mental health
care agent of that fact as promptly as possible.

Unless a directive expressly provides otherwise, if after executing a directive, the declarant marries, such marriage shall revoke the designation of a person other than the declarant’s spouse as the declarant’s mental health care agent, and if, after
executing a directive, the declarant’s marriage is dissolved or annulled, such dissolution or annulment shall revoke the designation of the declarant’s former spouse as the declarant’s mental health care agent.

A directive which survives disability, incapacity, or incompetency shall not be revoked solely by the appointment of a guardian or receiver for the declarant. Absent an order of the probate court or superior court having jurisdiction directing a guardian
of the person to exercise the powers of the declarant under a directive which survives disability, incapacity, or incompetency, the guardian of the person has no power, duty, or liability with respect to any mental health care
matters covered by the directive; provided, however, that no order usurping the authority of a mental health care agent known to the proposed guardian shall be entered unless notice is sent by first-class mail to the mental health
care agent’s last known address and it is shown by clear and convincing evidence that the mental health care agent is acting in a manner inconsistent with the directive.

History. Code 1981, §

37-11-10

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 611, § 1-1/HB 752.

37-11-11.
Inclusion in medical record; continuing consent.

Upon being presented with a psychiatric advance directive, a provider or facility shall make the directive a part of a declarant’s medical record.

In the absence of specific knowledge of the revocation or invalidity of a directive, a provider or facility providing mental health care to a declarant may presume that a person who executed a psychiatric advance directive in accordance with this chapter
was of sound mind and acted voluntarily when executing such directive and may rely upon a psychiatric advance directive or a copy of that directive.

A provider or facility shall be authorized to act in accordance with a directive when a declarant is incapable of making mental health care decisions.

A provider or facility shall continue to obtain a declarant’s consent to all mental health care decisions if he or she is capable of providing consent or refusal.

History. Code 1981, §

37-11-11

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 611, § 1-1/HB 752.

37-11-12.
Compliance by providers and facilities with directive; obligations; transfers; payment assurances.

When acting under the authority of a directive, a provider or facility shall comply with it to the fullest extent possible unless the requested mental health care is:

Unavailable;

Medically contraindicated in a manner that would result in substantial harm to the declarant if administered; or

In the opinion of the provider or facility, inconsistent with reasonable medical standards to benefit the declarant or has proven ineffective in treating such declarant’s mental health condition.

In the event that a part of a directive is unable to be followed due to any of the circumstances set forth in paragraph (1) of this subsection, all other parts of such directive shall be followed.

If a provider or facility is unwilling at any time for one or more of the reasons set forth in paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of this Code section to comply with a declarant’s wishes as set forth in the directive or with the decision of such declarant’s
agent, such provider or facility shall:

Document the reason for not following the directive in such declarant’s medical record; and

Promptly notify such declarant and his or her agent, if one is appointed in the directive, or otherwise such declarant’s legal guardian, of the refusal to follow the directive or instructions of the agent and document the notification in such declarant’s
medical record.

In the event a provider or facility is unwilling at any time for one or more of the reasons set forth in paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of this Code section to comply with a declarant’s wishes as set forth in the directive or with the decision of such
declarant’s agent, if an agent has been appointed, then the declarant’s agent, or otherwise such declarant’s legal guardian, shall arrange for such declarant’s transfer to another provider or facility if the requested care would
be delivered by that other provider or facility.

A provider or facility unwilling at any time for one or more of the reasons set forth in paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of this Code section to comply with a declarant’s wishes as set forth in the directive or with the decision of a declarant’s mental
health care agent shall continue to provide reasonably necessary consultation and care in connection with the pending transfer.

A psychiatric advance directive shall not limit the involuntary examination, treatment, or hospitalization of patients pursuant to Chapter 3 or Chapter 7 of this title or evaluations or treatment services rendered pursuant to a court order under Code
Section 17-7-130, 17-7-130.1, or 17-7-131.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require a provider or facility to provide mental health care for which a declarant or a third-party payor is unable or refuses to ensure payment.

History. Code 1981, §

37-11-12

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 611, § 1-1/HB 752.

37-11-13.
Immunity from liability or disciplinary action for health care providers.

Each provider, facility, or any other person who acts in good faith reliance on any instructions contained in a directive or on any direction or decision by a mental health care agent shall be protected and released to the same extent as though such person
had interacted directly with a capable declarant.

Without limiting the generality of the provisions of subsection (a) of this Code section, the following specific provisions shall also govern, protect, and validate the acts of a mental health care agent and each such provider, facility, and any other
person acting in good faith reliance on such instruction, direction, or decision:

No provider, facility, or person shall be subject to civil or criminal liability or discipline for unprofessional conduct solely for complying with any instructions contained in a directive or with any direction or decision by a mental health care agent,
even if death or injury to the declarant ensues;

No provider, facility, or person shall be subject to civil or criminal liability or discipline for unprofessional conduct solely for failure to comply with any instructions contained in a directive or with any direction or decision by a mental health
care agent, so long as such provider, facility, or person promptly informs such agent of such provider’s, facility’s, or person’s refusal or failure to comply with the directive or with any direction or decision by the
mental health care agent. The mental health care agent shall then be responsible for arranging the declarant’s transfer to another provider. A provider who is unwilling to comply with the mental health care agent’s decision
or the directive shall continue to provide reasonably necessary consultation and care in connection with the pending transfer;

If the actions of a provider, facility, or person who fails to comply with any instruction contained in a directive or with any direction or decision by a mental health care agent are substantially in accord with reasonable medical standards at the time
of consent or refusal of mental health care and such provider, facility, or person cooperates in the transfer of the declarant pursuant to subsection (d) of Code Section 37-11-12, such provider, facility, or person shall
not be subject to civil or criminal liability or discipline for unprofessional conduct for failure to comply with the psychiatric advance directive;

No mental health care agent who, in good faith, acts with due care for the benefit of the declarant and in accordance with the terms of a directive, or who fails to act, shall be subject to civil or criminal liability for such action or inaction;

If the authority granted by a psychiatric advance directive is revoked under Code Section 37-11-10, a provider, facility, or agent shall not be subject to criminal prosecution or civil liability for acting in good faith reliance upon such psychiatric
advance directive unless such provider, facility, or agent had actual knowledge of the revocation; and

In the event a declarant has appointed a health care agent in accordance with Chapter 32 of Title 31, no provider, facility, or person who relies in good faith on the direction of such health care agent shall be subject to civil or criminal liability
or discipline for unprofessional conduct for complying with any direction or decision of such health care agent in the event the declarant’s condition is subsequently determined to be a mental health care condition.

History. Code 1981, §

37-11-13

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 611, § 1-1/HB 752.

37-11-14.
Immunity for law enforcement.

A law enforcement officer who uses a declarant’s valid psychiatric advance directive and acts in good faith reliance on the instructions contained in such directive shall not be subject to criminal prosecution or civil liability for any harm to such declarant
that results from a good faith effort to follow such directive’s instructions.

History. Code 1981, §

37-11-14

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 611, § 1-1/HB 752.

37-11-15.
Application; usage of form; use of substantially similar forms.

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to or invalidate a valid psychiatric advance directive executed prior to July 1, 2022.

The use of the form set forth in Code Section 37-11-16 or a similar form after July 1, 2022, in the creation of a psychiatric advance directive shall be deemed lawful and, when such form is used and it meets the requirements of this chapter, it shall
be construed in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

Any person may use another form for a psychiatric advance directive so long as the form is substantially similar to, otherwise complies with the provisions of this chapter, and provides notice to a declarant substantially similar to that contained in
the form set forth in Code Section 37-11-16. As used in this subsection, the term “substantially similar” may include forms from other states.

History. Code 1981, §

37-11-15

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 611, § 1-1/HB 752.